North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 5. General Provisions.

§ 146-21.
Intent of Subchapter.

It is the purpose and intent of this Subchapter to provide for and regulate the acquisition, disposition, and management of all State lands other than the vacant and unappropriated lands, swamplands, lands acquired by the State by virtue of being sold for taxes, and submerged lands.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

Compensation To NC State For DOT I-440 Project

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 34.4, provides: “Notwithstanding any provision of Subchapter II of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes to the contrary, proceeds derived from compensation received by the State for any impact from the I-440 Expansion Project (STIP Project No. U-2719) on improvements to land owned, assigned to, or under the supervision and control of North Carolina State University (University) or an associated entity, as defined in the UNC Policy Manual 600.2.5.2[R] as adopted June 8, 2015, shall be deposited in the fund, budget code, or account of the University or associated entity, respectively. Funds deposited pursuant to this section shall be used to remedy the impact from the I-440 Expansion Project and are appropriated for the purpose set forth in this section. Funds deposited pursuant to this section shall not revert but shall remain available until expended in accordance with the purpose set forth in this section.”